Illinois, session 104th, HB1265.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-3-13 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-13)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-13)7    Sec. 3-3-13. Procedure for executive clemency. 8    (a) Petitions seeking pardon, commutation, or reprieve 9shall be addressed to the Governor and filed with the Prisoner 10Review Board. The petition shall be in writing and signed by 11the person under conviction or by a person on his behalf. It 12shall contain a brief history of the case, the reasons for 13seeking executive clemency, and other relevant information the 14Board may require.15    (a-5) After a petition has been denied by the Governor, 16the Board may not accept a repeat petition for executive 17clemency for the same person until one full year has elapsed 18from the date of the denial. The Chairman of the Board may 19waive the one-year requirement if the petitioner offers in 20writing new information that was unavailable to the petitioner 21at the time of the filing of the prior petition and which the 22Chairman determines to be significant. The Chairman also may 23waive the one-year waiting period if the petitioner can show   HB1265- 2 -LRB104 03762 RLC 17319 b1that a change in circumstances of a compelling humanitarian 2nature has arisen since the denial of the prior petition.3    (b) Notice of the proposed application shall be given by 4the Board to the committing court and the state's attorney of 5the county where the conviction was had.6    (b-5) Victims registered with the Board shall receive 7reasonable written notice not less than 30 days prior to the 8executive clemency hearing date. If the victim is not 9registered with the Board, the Board shall contact the 10sentencing county's State's Attorney's Office for the victim's 11last known address. The Board shall send notice to the last 12known address of the victim. The victim has the right to submit 13a victim statement to the Prisoner Review Board for 14consideration at an executive clemency hearing as provided in 15subsection (c) of this Section. Victim statements provided to 16the Board shall be confidential and privileged, including any 17statements received prior to the effective date of this 18amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, except if the 19statement was an oral statement made by the victim at a hearing 20open to the public. At the request of the victim, the Board 21shall allow the victim to provide oral testimony via 22electronic means and not require the victim to appear in 23person at the executive clemency hearing. A victim who has 24supplied a statement to the Prisoner Review Board may waive 25notice of petitions for clemency and the waiver must be in 26writing. The statement supplied by the victim shall be part of   HB1265- 3 -LRB104 03762 RLC 17319 b1all petitions for clemency filed by the petitioner. A victim 2who waives notice shall receive notice if the Prisoner Review 3Board makes a recommendation of clemency to the Governor. The 4notice to the victim of a recommendation of clemency shall be 5in writing and given not less than 30 days prior to the Board's 6recommendation of clemency being sent to the Governor. 7    (c) The Board shall, upon due notice, give a hearing to 8each application, allowing representation by counsel, if 9desired, after which it shall confidentially advise the 10Governor by a written report of its recommendations which 11shall be determined by majority vote. The written report to 12the Governor shall be confidential and privileged, including 13any reports made prior to the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. The Board shall 15meet to consider such petitions no less than 4 times each year.16    (d) The Governor shall decide each application and 17communicate his decision to the Board which shall notify the 18petitioner.19    In the event a petitioner who has been convicted of a Class 20X felony is granted a release, after the Governor has 21communicated such decision to the Board, the Board shall give 22written notice to the Sheriff of the county from which the 23offender was sentenced if such sheriff has requested that such 24notice be given on a continuing basis. In cases where arrest of 25the offender or the commission of the offense took place in any 26municipality with a population of more than 10,000 persons,   HB1265- 4 -LRB104 03762 RLC 17319 b1the Board shall also give written notice to the proper law 2enforcement agency for said municipality which has requested 3notice on a continuing basis.4    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit 5the power of the Governor under the constitution to grant a 6reprieve, commutation of sentence, or pardon.7(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.)